Georgia statutes. TITLE 1 General Provisions
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

Law reviews.

For article, “Fiction in the Code:
Reading Legislation as Literature,” see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 581 (2018).

1-1-1.
Enactment of Code.

The statutory portion of the codification of Georgia laws prepared by the Code Revision Commission and the Michie Company pursuant to a contract entered into on June 19, 1978, is enacted and shall have the effect of statutes enacted by the General Assembly of Georgia. The statutory portion and numbering and arrangement of such codification, along with supplementary content determined to be useful to users, shall be published by the state and when so published shall be known and may be cited as the “Official Code of Georgia Annotated.”

The following matter contained in the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, including all supplements and revised volumes thereof, shall be considered enacted by the General Assembly:

Statutory text; and

Arrangement and numbering system, including, but not limited to, title, chapter, article, part, subpart, Code section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, division, and subdivision numbers and designations.

The following matter contained in the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, including all supplements and revised volumes thereof, shall not be considered enacted by the General Assembly, shall bear no additional weight or effect, and shall not be construed to have the imprimatur of the General Assembly by virtue of such inclusion in the Official Code of Georgia Annotated:

Case annotations;

Research references, including, but not limited to:

Law reviews;

Collateral references to secondary sources;

Opinions of the Georgia Attorney General;

Advisory opinions of the State Bar; and

Cross-references;

Captions;

Catchlines;

Headings;

Title and chapter analyses;

History lines;

Repeal lines;

Editorial notes;

Amendment notes;

Code Commission notes;

Effective date notes;

Tables;

User’s Guide;

General Index;

Volume indices;

Indices related to local and special laws;

Conversion tables;

Rules and regulations of state agencies, departments, boards, commissions, or other entities;

Material in brackets or parentheses and editorial, delayed effective date, effect of amendment, or other similar notes within the text of a Code section which has been added by the publisher in order to explain or to prevent a misapprehension concerning the contents of the Code section; and

Any other matter published in the Official Code of Georgia Annotated which is not included in subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 1; Ga. L. 2021, p. 916, § 1/SB 238.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “The statutory portion of the codification of Georgia laws prepared by the Code Revision Commission and the Michie Company pursuant to a contract entered into on June 19, 1978, is enacted and shall have the effect of statutes enacted by the General Assembly of Georgia. The statutory portion of such codification shall be merged with annotations, captions, catchlines, history lines, editorial notes, cross-references, indices, title and chapter analyses, and other materials pursuant to the contract and shall be published by authority of the state pursuant to such contract and when so published shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Official Code of Georgia Annotated.’”

Cross references.

Powers and duties of Code Revision Commission regarding publication of Code, §§

28-9-3

,

28-9-5

.

Effect of reenactment of the Code, §

28-9-5

.

Authorization to use state emblem on cover of official Code, §

50-3-8(b)

.

Editor’s notes.

The Michie Company, referred to in this Code section, now operates under the trade name LexisNexis®, a division of ReedElsevier. For the Acts reenacting the Official Code of Georgia Annotated as amended by the text and numbering contained in the 1982 through 2022 supplements, see Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 54; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 54; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 54; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 54; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 54; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 54; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 54; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 54; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 54; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 54; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 54; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 54; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 54; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 54; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 54;
Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 54; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 54; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 54; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 54; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 54; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 54; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 54; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 54; Ga. L. 2008, p. 324, § 54; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 54; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 54; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 54; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 54, Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 54; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 54; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 54; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 54/HB 737; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 54/HB 323; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 54/SB 365; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 54/SB52; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 54/SB 429; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 54/HB 497; and Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 54/HB 1428, respectively.

Law reviews.

For discussion of the work of the Code Revision Commission in making the Code, see 18 Ga. St. B.J. 102 (1982).

For article, “Researching Georgia Law,” see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 585 (1993).

For article, “Researching Georgia Law,” see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 741 (2015).

For article, “

Code Revision Commission v. Public.Resource.Org

and the Fight Over Copyright Protection for Annotations and Commentary,” see 54 Ga. L. Rev. 111 (2019).

1-1-2.
Legislative intent.

The enactment of this Code is intended as a recodification, revision, modernization, and reenactment of the general laws of the State of Georgia which are currently of force and is intended, where possible, to resolve conflicts which exist in the law and to repeal those laws which are obsolete as a result of the passage of time or other causes, which have been declared unconstitutional or invalid, or which have been superseded by the enactment of later laws. Except as otherwise specifically provided by particular provisions of this Code, the enactment of this Code by the General Assembly is not intended to alter the substantive law in existence on the effective date of this Code.

Cross references.

Effective date of Code, §

1-1-9

.

Law reviews.

For survey article on trial practice and procedure, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 299 (1982).

1-1-3.
Severability.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this Code or in an Act or resolution of the General Assembly, in the event any title, chapter, article, part, subpart, Code section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, item, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this Code or of any Act or resolution of the General Assembly is declared or adjudged to be invalid or unconstitutional, such declaration or adjudication shall not affect the remaining portions of this Code or of such Act or resolution, which shall remain of full force and effect as if such portion so declared or adjudged invalid or unconstitutional were not originally a part of this Code or of such Act or resolution. The General Assembly declares that it would have enacted the remaining parts of this Code if it had known that such portion hereof would be declared or adjudged invalid or unconstitutional. The General Assembly further declares that it would have enacted the remaining parts of any other Act or resolution if it had known that such portion thereof would be declared or adjudged invalid or unconstitutional unless such Act or resolution contains an express provision to the contrary.

1-1-4.
Validating Acts.

The omission from this Code of any Acts passed prior to the adoption of this Code which validated any bonds, notes, warrants, certificates, or other evidences of indebtedness issued by any political subdivision or instrumentality of the state shall in no way operate or be construed to repeal or destroy the effect of any and all of such validating Acts where such validating Acts have been otherwise lawfully passed and are not in conflict with the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Georgia.

1-1-5.
Effect of adoption of Code upon rules or regulations.

Unless otherwise provided, the adoption of this Code shall not invalidate or affect any rules or regulations which were in effect on November 1, 1982, promulgated pursuant to authority given by law, and such rules and regulations shall remain in force until repealed, replaced, or invalidated.

1-1-6.
Effect of adoption of Code upon terms of office and rights of officials or employees.

The adoption of this Code shall not affect the term of office or the right to hold office of any person who is in office on November 1, 1982, unless otherwise expressly provided or unless such office is abolished by the adoption of this Code.

The adoption of this Code shall not affect the compensation, expenses, per diem, allowances, retirement, or other rights of any official or employee of the state or any county, municipal corporation, school system, political subdivision, authority, or other governmental entity within this state, unless otherwise provided in this Code.

1-1-7.
[Reserved] Notes and catchlines of Code sections not part of law.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2021, p. 916, § 2/SB 238, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 916, § 2/SB 238 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2021.

1-1-8.
References to state law or this Code.

Unless otherwise indicated in the context, references in this Code to titles, chapters, articles, parts, subparts, or Code sections shall mean titles, chapters, articles, parts, subparts, or Code sections of this Code.

Unless there is an expressed intention to the contrary, any reference in this Code or in any law of this state to another provision of this Code or law of this state shall mean and be construed to refer to such other provision or law as it now or hereafter exists.

Any reference in any local or special law of this state to any Act or resolution of the General Assembly or to any title, chapter, section, or other portion of any prior code of this state shall be construed to be a reference to the appropriate title, chapter, article, part, subpart, Code section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, division, or subdivision of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated.

Unless otherwise indicated by the context in which it is used, any citation in any public or private document, writing, or other instrument to a law of the State of Georgia which has been codified in the Official Code of Georgia Annotated shall be construed to be a reference to such law as contained in the Official Code of Georgia Annotated.

Any reference in any Act of the General Assembly or in any other public or private document, writing, or other instrument to “O.C.G.A.” shall mean and refer to the Official Code of Georgia Annotated published under authority of the State of Georgia. The Official Code of Georgia Annotated published under authority of the State of Georgia may be cited or referred to as “O.C.G.A.”

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to mean that any matter contained in the Official Code of Georgia Annotated has any force of law or imprimatur of the State of Georgia except as provided for in Code Section 1-1-1.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8, § 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 2; Ga. L. 2021, p. 916, § 3/SB 238.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added subsection (f).

1-1-9.
Effective date of Code.

This Code shall become effective on November 1, 1982.

1-1-10.
Specific repealer; provisions saved from repeal.

The following Codes, laws, and parts of laws are repealed, except as otherwise provided in this Code section:

The Code of Georgia of 1933, as amended;

All general laws enacted by the General Assembly of Georgia prior to June 1, 1981, except this Code and except as otherwise provided in this Code section; and

All codes enacted or approved by the General Assembly prior to the Code of Georgia of 1933.

The following laws and parts of laws are not repealed by the adoption of this Code and shall remain of full force and effect until otherwise repealed, amended, superseded, or declared invalid or unconstitutional:

Acts and resolutions conveying, granting, leasing, encumbering, selling, exchanging, or authorizing easements in specific state-owned property or rights therein;

Acts and resolutions providing for appropriations of state funds;

Acts and resolutions granting compensation to persons, firms, partnerships, corporations, and private or governmental entities injured by the state or its officials, officers, employees, or agents;

Local Acts and resolutions of the General Assembly which are in effect on November 1, 1982, and which are not in conflict with this Code;

Acts and resolutions which by their terms are applicable to a named superior court or judicial circuit, including but not limited to Acts fixing the terms of court and Acts providing for judges, district attorneys, or other personnel or their compensation, powers, or duties;

Resolutions proposing amendments to the Constitution or proposing a new Constitution or portions thereof;

Acts and resolutions ceding jurisdiction over territory within the state to the federal government;

Acts and resolutions creating committees or commissions of the General Assembly or authorizing studies;

Acts and resolutions providing for the furnishing of law books to various courts, governmental entities, libraries, and public officials;

Acts and resolutions designating or naming highways, bridges, buildings, ferries, dams, structures, parks, natural resources, or other property or authorizing the placement of statues, plaques, memorials, portraits, or monuments;

Resolutions relating to or providing for the internal operation of the General Assembly;

Resolutions not intended to have the force and effect of law;

General Acts of local application which are based on population and which have not been specifically repealed or declared invalid or unconstitutional;

Acts and resolutions honoring, commending, or recognizing individuals, groups, principles, or ideas or urging that certain acts be done or refrained from by the federal, state, or local governments or by individuals, groups, or entities; and

Acts and resolutions relieving sureties or bondsmen.

The following specific laws and parts of laws are not repealed by the adoption of this Code and shall remain of full force and effect, pursuant to their terms, until otherwise repealed, amended, superseded, or declared invalid or unconstitutional:

An Act for reviving and enforcing certain laws therein mentioned and adopting the common laws of England as they existed on May 14, 1776, approved February 25, 1784. (For the adopting Act of 1784, see Prince’s 1822 Digest, p. 570; Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 721; and Code of 1863, Section 1, paragraph 6.)

Section 10 of an Act amending an Act prohibiting certain practices in connection with real estate transactions, approved March 24, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 480).

Section 13 of an Act known as the “Georgia Marketing Act of 1981,” approved April 13, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 1354).

Sections 1 and 67 of an Act to revise, modernize, codify, and update certain laws relating to alcoholic beverages, approved April 13, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269).

Section 4 of an Act amending an Act known as the “Insurance Premium Finance Company Act,” approved April 7, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 760).

Sections 5 and 6 of an Act amending Code Title 56, known as the “Georgia Insurance Code,” so as to provide additional qualifications for licensure of agents and counselors for life or accident and sickness insurance and for the making of annuity contracts, approved April 17, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 1789).

Section 1 of an Act prohibiting discrimination in the employment of the handicapped and known as the “Georgia Equal Employment for the Handicapped Code,” approved April 17, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 1803).

Section 3 of an Act amending Code Section 56-3005, relating to optional policy provisions in accident and sickness policies, so as to remove the provisions relating to insurance with other insurers, approved April 9, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 1009).

Section 4 of an Act amending Code Title 114, relating to workers’ compensation, so as to redefine the term “employee,” approved April 17, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 1585).

Section 3 of an Act amending Code Title 56, known as the “Georgia Insurance Code,” so as to require that certain accident and sickness policies and plans provide conversion privileges for insured surviving spouses or former spouses, approved April 7, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 640).

Section 2 of an Act amending Code Section 3-305, relating to suits against representatives of obligors, so as to reduce the period of exemption from suit for representatives of estates from 12 months to six months, approved April 9, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 852).

An Act providing that the State of Georgia shall be a party to the “Southern Interstate Nuclear Compact,” approved March 3, 1962, (Ga. L. 1962, p. 505), as amended.

A resolution creating the Georgia Semiquincentenary Commission, approved April 14, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 1472).

Section 1 of an Act authorizing the Supreme Court of Georgia to establish a uniform motion for review procedure, approved March 20, 1980 (Ga. L. 1980, p. 390).

Section 2 of an Act providing for distribution of certain moneys received or to be received as a result of the commission of a crime, approved April 17, 1979 (Ga. L. 1979, p. 1262).

Section 4 of an Act amending certain provisions relating to trial and accusation and waiver of indictment, approved March 20, 1980 (Ga. L. 1980, p. 452).

Section 4 of an Act providing for an additional credit to be given to criminal defendants who are confined in an institution or facility for treatment or examination of a physical or mental disability, approved April 3, 1972 (Ga. L. 1972, p. 742).

Sections 14 and 15 of an Act providing for representation by counsel, services, and facilities for indigent persons in criminal proceedings, approved April 18, 1968 (Ga. L. 1968, p. 999).

Section 13 of an Act to provide defense services for indigent persons accused of crime, approved March 9, 1979 (Ga. L. 1979, p. 367).

A resolution approving the adoption of the rules of the Supreme Court, approved April 14, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 1532).

Section 7 of an Act creating a new judicial circuit for this state to be known as the Douglas Judicial Circuit, approved March 20, 1980 (Ga. L. 1980, p. 563).

Section 38-612 of the Code of 1933, relating to Acts allowing papers improperly registered, and their copies, when lost, to be admitted in evidence.

Section 3 of an Act providing for the incorporation by reference of various fiduciary powers into wills, trusts, or other instruments in writing and providing that no exercise of any such power or authority by a fiduciary shall deprive the trust or estate involved of an otherwise available tax exemption, approved April 17, 1973 (Ga. L. 1973, p. 846).

Section 3 of an Act amending an Act providing for the incorporation by reference of various fiduciary powers into wills, trusts, and other instruments in writing, approved April 17, 1973 (Ga. L. 1973, p. 846), and providing that the Act shall not apply to any will, trust, or other instrument executed prior to April 7, 1976, approved April 7, 1976 (Ga. L. 1976, p. 1586).

Section 2 of an Act providing that mutual wills, other than mutual wills based on express contract, must contain an express statement that such wills are mutual wills, approved April 18, 1967 (Ga. L. 1967, p. 718).

Sections 4 through 9 of an Act to provide for the number of witnesses required to attest wills and codicils and to provide for the execution and probate of wills and codicils, approved May 28, 1964 (Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 16).

Section 2 of an Act providing a residuary bequest or devise to a surviving widow in lieu of dower or years support shall be subject to debts, taxes, expenses of administration and similar charges, approved April 8, 1968 (Ga. L. 1968, p. 1070).

Section 2 of an Act changing from six months to nine months the time period within which a written instrument of renunciation must be filed, approved April 17, 1979 (Ga. L. 1979, p. 1292).

Section 2 of an Act providing additional procedures for taking the testimony of witnesses for wills, approved March 24, 1976 (Ga. L. 1976, p. 640).

Section 2 of an Act providing how guardians, administrators, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries may sell stocks or bonds, approved March 2, 1953 (Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 378).

Section 15 of an Act providing for the supervision by the Attorney General of the administration of charitable trusts, approved March 21, 1974 (Ga. L. 1974, p. 440).

Section 6 of an Act prescribing procedure for appeals upon petition to the Supreme Court or Court of Appeals in certain specified cases shall not apply to appeals in certain habeas corpus cases, approved April 12, 1979 (Ga. L. 1979, p. 619).

Section 1 of an Act to be known as the “Georgia Public Revenue Code” and revising and modernizing certain revenue laws and to provide legislative intent, approved March 6, 1978 (Ga. L. 1978, p. 309).

Section 13 of an Act creating the Department of Offender Rehabilitation and the Board of Offender Rehabilitation and abolishing the State Board of Probation, approved April 6, 1972 (Ga. L. 1972, p. 1069).

Section 3 of an Act prohibiting any interference with the printing of the reports of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals, approved March 29, 1937 (Ga. L. 1937, p. 503).

Section 7 of an Act providing that the powers and duties of the Department of Administrative Services relative to contracts for supplies and services required by the state shall not be construed to affect, repeal, or limit an Act known as the “Unemployment Compensation Law,” approved April 12, 1979 (Ga. L. 1979, p. 659).

Section 2 of an Act providing that the provisions regarding membership of certain metropolitan area planning and development commissions shall not be changed, approved April 6, 1978 (Ga. L. 1978, p. 2066).

Section 2 of an Act providing that certain additional authority granted to each area planning and development commission and the expiration of such authority shall not repeal, limit, or diminish any power heretofore possessed by any metropolitan area planning and development commission, approved March 23, 1977 (Ga. L. 1977, p. 782).

Section 5 of an Act providing that certain functions and authority granted to area planning and development commissions shall be cumulative of any authority provided to certain metropolitan area planning and development commissions and shall not diminish any authority heretofore granted to any such commission, approved April 11, 1978 (Ga. L. 1978, p. 2293).

Section 2 of an Act reestablishing the Georgia Council for the Arts and Humanities, approved March 13, 1979 (Ga. L. 1979, p. 388).

Section 9 of an Act substantially amending the duties, responsibilities and procedures of the Public Service Commission, approved April 14, 1975 (Ga. L. 1975, p. 404).

Section 7 of an Act amending the powers and duties of the State Depository Board and the regulation of deposits therein, approved March 23, 1960 (Ga. L. 1960, p. 1144).

Section 11 of the “Telecommunications Consolidation Act of 1973,” approved April 18, 1973 (Ga. L. 1973, p. 1261).

Section 9 of the “Public Safety Radio Services Act of 1975,” approved April 28, 1975 (Ga. L. 1975, p. 1642).

Section 2 of an Act amending an Act implementing the requirements of the Federal Intergovernmental Cooperation Act of 1968, approved March 20, 1980 (Ga. L. 1980, p. 736).

Section 2 of an Act providing that powers of sale and other powers in deeds of trust, mortgages, and other instruments may be exercised by transferees and other parties regardless of whether or not the transfer specifically includes such powers or conveys title to the property described, approved April 18, 1967 (Ga. L. 1967, p. 735).

Section 4 of an Act providing that a power of sale, unless limited in the instrument creating such power, authorizes a private sale by the donee of such power, except as to instruments given to secure a debt, approved March 4, 1955 (Ga. L. 1955, p. 430).

An Act requiring the conditional sales of personal property to be evidenced in writing, approved September 27, 1881 (Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 143), as amended.

An Act to provide that the lien of mortgages on crops given to secure the payment of debts for supplies, money, and other articles of necessity shall be superior to judgments of older date than the mortgages, approved December 21, 1899 (Ga. L. 1899, p. 78).

An Act to extend the lien of mortgages on crops, before the crops are planted or growing, approved July 15, 1924 (Ga. L. 1924, p. 125).

Sections 2 and 3 of an Act declaring that growing crops shall be personalty and providing that mortgages or other liens thereof shall be attested and recorded as chattel mortgages, approved August 21, 1922 (Ga. L. 1922, p. 114).

An Act authorizing the securing of advances made for the purpose of planting, making, or gathering crops by giving a bill of sale, approved August 22, 1925 (Ga. L. 1925, p. 118), as amended.

An Act declaring the selling or encumbering of personal property held under a conditional purchase to be illegal, approved September 28, 1883 (Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 111).

An Act to prevent the removal of personal property from this state held under a conditional purchase and sale, and by the terms of the purchase, the title is retained by the vendor until the purchase price is paid, without the consent of the vendor, and to prevent the vendee in such a purchase and sale from concealing the property, approved August 15, 1910 (Ga. L. 1910, p. 120).

An Act to be known as the “Apartment Ownership Act,” approved April 12, 1963 (Ga. L. 1963, p. 561), as amended.

An Act to create the positions of associate public service commissioners, approved February 18, 1953 (Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 127).

An Act to declare valid and legal the establishment and organization of housing authorities and all bonds, notes, contracts, agreements, obligations, and undertakings of such authorities, approved March 23, 1939 (Ga. L. 1939, p. 126).

An Act to validate and declare legal all notes and bonds of housing authorities, and all civil proceedings, acts, and things heretofore undertaken, performed, or done with reference thereto, approved March 15, 1971 (Ga. L. 1971, p. 94).

An Act to validate and declare legal the creation and establishment of housing authorities and all bonds, notes, contracts, agreements, obligations, and undertakings of such authorities, approved February 14, 1951 (Ga. L. 1951, p. 127).

An Act to validate and declare legal the creation and establishment of housing authorities and all bonds, notes, contracts, agreements, obligations, and undertakings of such authorities, approved March 10, 1959 (Ga. L. 1959, p. 141).

An Act to validate and declare legal the creation and establishment of housing authorities and all bonds, contracts, agreements, notes, obligations, and undertakings of such authorities, approved March 9, 1962 (Ga. L. 1962, p. 734).

Section 1 of an Act to provide for the number of directors of railroad corporations, and to provide for the ratification of prior actions of boards of directors thereof, approved April 23, 1969 (Ga. L. 1969, p. 589).

An Act to provide that the seal of a notary need not be required to his attestation of deeds and to provide for the ratification of certain deeds, approved February 12, 1952 (Ga. L. 1952, p. 456).

An Act to create certain emeritus offices of the state, to provide for appointment, compensation, and duties, as amended, approved March 7, 1957 (Ga. L. 1957, p. 206).

A resolution giving assent of this state to an act of Congress of the United States providing for cooperative agricultural extension work, approved August 14, 1914 (Ga. L. 1914, p. 1243).

An Act to enlarge the powers of the Board of Trustees of Georgia Military College, approved March 24, 1939 (Ga. L. 1939, p. 410).

An Act to authorize the Toccoa Falls Institute to confer the degree of bachelor of arts in biblical education, approved March 24, 1939 (Ga. L. 1939, p. 412).

An Act designating Fort Valley State College as a land-grant college, approved February 25, 1949 (Ga. L. 1949, p. 1144).

An Act known as the “Georgia Professional Standards Act,” approved March 25, 1976 (Ga. L. 1976, p. 966).

An Act known as the “State School Building Authority for the Deaf and Blind Act,” approved February 21, 1951 (Ga. L. 1951, p. 637).

An Act known as the “Vocational Trade School Building Authority Act,” approved February 16, 1951 (Ga. L. 1951, p. 132).

Section 2 of an Act to amend Code Title 49, relating to guardians and wards, as amended, so as to enact Chapter 9 of Title 49 and to provide that a guardian need not be appointed for a minor or an incompetent person in certain instances, approved April 18, 1967 (Ga. L. 1967, p. 720).

Section 3 of an Act to amend Code Title 49, relating to guardians and wards, as amended, so as to revise, modernize, and supersede Code Chapter 49-6, relating to guardians of insane persons or persons otherwise mentally incapable of managing their estates, approved April 8, 1980 (Ga. L. 1980, p. 1661).

Section 5 of an Act substantially revising the law relating to the joint-secretary of the state examining boards, as amended, in particular to provide an exception, approved April 22, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 1898).

Section 3 of an Act to amend Code Title 74, relating to parent and child, as amended, by enacting a new Code chapter relating to determination of paternity, approved April 1, 1980 (Ga. L. 1980, p. 1374).

Section 7 of the “Georgia Child Custody Intrastate Jurisdiction Act of 1978,” approved April 5, 1978 (Ga. L. 1978, p. 1957).

Sections 1 and 49 of an Act substantially revising and modernizing certain laws of this state relating to family, domestic relations, and interfamilial duties, approved April 4, 1979 (Ga. L. 1979, p. 466).

Sections 29 and 30 of the “Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act,” approved February 20, 1958 (Ga. L. 1958, p. 34).

History.

Code 1981, §

1-1-10

; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 3, effective April 1, 1982, and Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, effective November 1, 1982, repealed and codified numerous general Acts of local application. See Index to Local and Special Laws and General Laws of Local Application, contained in Volume 42 of this Code.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was created as part of the Code revision and was thus enacted by Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8, (Code Enactment Act).

1-1-11.
General repealer.

All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Code are repealed.